data/sources/glossaries/co/raw/apertium-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="lasc/ià__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ià</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ia</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parla/lli"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ia</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>
      <e><p><l>iendu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ii</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ia</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>iemu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iate</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ianu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iani</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>i</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ite</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>iò</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iarianu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>eghja</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>arà</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>erà</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ierà</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eremu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ieremu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>iava</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iave</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iava</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iavamu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iavete</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iavanu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>assi</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>essi</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>assi</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>essi</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>assi</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>essi</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ieranu</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ia</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>iat</l><r>ià<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="parl/à__vblex">
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parla/lli"/></e>
      <e><p><l>èndu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>andu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>u</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ani</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>i</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ite</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ò</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <!--<e><p><l>eghja</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>--> <!-- FIXME: CHECK -->

      <e><p><l>aru</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- FIXME: CHECK -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eru</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- FIXME: CHECK -->
      <e><p><l>arà</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>erà</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eremu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eranu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ava</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ave</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ava</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avamu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avete</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avanu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>assi</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>essi</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>assi</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>essi</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>assi</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>essi</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p><l>a</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>at</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bastà"><i>bast</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunfinà"><i>cunfin</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mancà"><i>manc</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trovà"><i>trov</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="approntà"><i>appront</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trattà"><i>tratt</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rializà" r="LR"><p><l>realiz</l><r>rializ</r></p><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rapprisint" r="LR"><p><l>rapprisent</l><r>rapprisint</r></p><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="passà"><i>pass</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="firmà"><i>firm</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="salpà"><i>salp</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inspirà"><i>inspir</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mudificà"><i>mudific</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="elevà"><i>elev</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dirivà"><i>diriv</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arregistrà"><i>arregistr</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="felicità"><i>felicit</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pinsà"><i>pins</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rispettà"><i>rispett</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scambià"><i>scamb</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="assumiglià"><i>assumigl</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="minaccià"><i>minacc</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prununzià"><i>prununz</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ripudià"><i>ripud</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cummencià"><i>cummenc</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="assucià"><i>assuc</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="assucià" r="LR"><p><l>assoc</l><r>assuc</r></p><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lancià"><i>lanc</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cumincià"><i>cuminc</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cumincià" r="LR"><p><l>cumminc</l><r>cuminc</r></p><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="travaglià"><i>travagl</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="piglià"><i>pigl</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ripiglià"><i>ripigl</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="enuncià"><i>enunc</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lascià"><i>lasc</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sveglià"><i>svegl</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="principià"><i>princip</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="invià"><i>inv</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="studià"><i>stud</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cambià"><i>camb</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="crià"><i>cr</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rilancià"><i>rilanc</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inizià"><i>iniz</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="apprezià"><i>apprezi</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="neguzià"><i>neguzi</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fermà"><i>ferm</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sbuccià"><i>sbucc</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chjappà"><i>chjapp</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="benefizià"><i>benefiz</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="evuluvà"><i>evuluv</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rimarcà"><i>rimarc</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="impastà"><i>impast</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scempià"><i>scemp</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="accuncià"><i>accunc</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sunà"><i>sun</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="traccià"><i>tracc</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="plasticheghjà"><i>plasticheghj</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="giranduleghjà"><i>giranduleghj</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="appoghjà"><i>appoghj</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="strappà"><i>strapp</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="divurzià"><i>divurz</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ghjustificà"><i>ghjustific</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="imbestià"><i>imbest</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inghjulià"><i>inghjul</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="piantà"><i>piant</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ringrazià"><i>ringraz</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rinvià"><i>rinv</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sonà"><i>son</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunsiglià"><i>cunsigl</i><par n="lasc/ià__vblex"/></e>
